South Dakota, session 2026, SB24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
A motor vehicle owner who is a resident of this state, has a South Dakota driver
license, and has complied with all laws of this state in relation to the registration of a
motor vehicle may receive a solid background license plate. The solid background license
plates may be issued only upon proof of payment of the current registration fees.
Solid background license plates may be used only on automobiles, pickup trucks,
or vans licensed pursuant to § 32-5-6; motorcycles licensed pursuant to § 32-5-9; and
pickup trucks licensed pursuant to § 32-5-6.3. Solid background license plates must be
displayed in accordance with § 32-5-98.
Annual renewal of solid background license plates must be in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
The fee for solid background license plates is one hundred dollars at the initial
issuance of the plates and one hundred dollars at the time of each annual registration
renewal.
Twenty-five dollars from each initial fee and each annual registration renewal fee
must be deposited into the license plate special revenue fund.
Seventy-five dollars from each initial fee and each annual registration renewal fee
must be deposited into the state highway fund.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
The Department of Revenue shall design the solid background license plates in
accordance with § 32-5-86. The department shall create and offer:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.378.15 2 24
(1) A solid black background license plate with white letters and numbers; and
(2) A solid white background license plate with black letters and numbers.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
An owner may choose to personalize a solid background license plate for an
additional initial fee of twenty-five dollars. The personalized plate message must comply
with the requirements for special personalized license plates in § 32-5-89.2. All fees
collected pursuant to this section must be credited to the license plate special revenue
fund.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
The solid background license plates may be transferred and replaced in the same
manner as emblem specialty plates pursuant to §§ 32-5-171 to 32-5-173, inclusive.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.